District of Columbia statutes.
22-4015

Penalties; mandatory release condition.

(a)

Any sex offender who knowingly violates any requirement of this chapter, including any requirement adopted by the Agency pursuant to this chapter, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or imprisoned for not more than 180 days, or both. In the event that a sex offender convicted under this section has a prior conviction under this section, or a prior conviction in any other jurisdiction for failing to comply with the requirements of a sex offender registration program, the sex offender shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or imprisoned not more than 5 years, or both.

(b)

Compliance with the requirements of this chapter, including any requirements adopted by the Agency pursuant to this chapter, shall be a mandatory condition of probation, parole, supervised release, and conditional release of any sex offender.

July 11, 2000, D.C. Law 13-137, § 16, 47 DCR 797
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 236, 60 DCR 2064
This section is referenced in § 16-801.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317, in (a), substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000” in the first sentence, and for “not more than $25,000” in the second sentence.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 236 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.